Louisiana, session 2026, SB420.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 48:2094(C) and 2094(H) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 48:2094(C)(8) and (9) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2094. Lafayette Metropolitan Expressway Commission; creation; board of
directors; meetings; quorum
* * *
C. The board shall be composed of eleven thirteen directors who shall be the
governing body of the commission with full power to promulgate rules and
regulations for the maintenance and operation of said authority as follows:
* * *
(8) One member appointed by the Vermilion Parish Police Jury
President.
(9) One member appointed by the Iberia Parish President.
* * *
H. The boundary and jurisdiction of the commission shall be coextensive
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 420 ENROLLED
with the boundaries of Lafayette Parish, Vermilion, and Iberia parishes of
Louisiana.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.